Illinois, session 104th, SB3704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act 5is amended by changing Section 7a as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2605/7a)  (from Ch. 42, par. 326a)7    Sec. 7a. Discharge into sewers of a sanitary district. 8    (a) The terms used in this Section are defined as follows:9    "Board of Commissioners" means the Board of Commissioners 10of the sanitary district.11    "Sewage" means water-carried human wastes or a combination 12of water-carried wastes from residences, buildings, 13businesses, industrial establishments, institutions, or other 14places together with any ground, surface, storm, or other 15water that may be present.16    "Industrial Wastes" means all solids, liquids, or gaseous 17wastes resulting from any commercial, industrial, 18manufacturing, agricultural, trade, or business operation or 19process, or from the development, recovery, or processing of 20natural resources.21    "Other Wastes" means decayed wood, sawdust, shavings, 22bark, lime, refuse, ashes, garbage, offal, oil, tar, 23chemicals, and all other substances except sewage and   SB3704- 2 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1industrial wastes.2    "Person" means any individual, firm, association, joint 3venture, sole proprietorship, company, partnership, estate 4copartnership, corporation, joint stock company, trust, school 5district, unit of local government, or private corporation 6organized or existing under the laws of this or any other state 7or country.8    "Executive Director" means the executive director of the 9sanitary district.10    (b) It shall be unlawful for any person to discharge 11sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes into the sewerage 12system of a sanitary district or into any sewer connected 13therewith, except upon the terms and conditions that the 14sanitary district might reasonably impose by way of ordinance, 15permit, or otherwise.16    Any sanitary district, in addition to all other powers 17vested in it and in the interest of public health and safety, 18or as authorized by subsections (b) and (c) of Section 46 of 19the Environmental Protection Act, is hereby empowered to pass 20all ordinances, rules, or regulations necessary to implement 21this Section, including but not limited to, the imposition of 22charges based on factors that influence the cost of treatment, 23including strength and volume, and including the right of 24access during reasonable hours to the premises of a person for 25enforcement of adopted ordinances, rules, or regulations.26    (c) Whenever the sanitary district acting through the   SB3704- 3 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1executive director determines that sewage, industrial wastes, 2or other wastes are being discharged into the sewerage system 3and when, in the opinion of the executive director the 4discharge is in violation of an ordinance, permit, rules, or 5regulations of the sanitary district adopted by the Board of 6Commissioners under this Section governing industrial wastes 7or other wastes, the executive director shall order the 8offending party to cease and desist. The order shall be served 9on the offending party by U.S. first-class mail, U.S. 10certified mail, personally, or by email as provided in 11subsection (m).12    In the event the offending party fails or refuses to cease 13discontinue the violation discharge within 90 days after 14service of the cease and desist order and in the manner and to 15the extent prescribed under the sanitary district's ordinance, 16rules, or regulations, the executive director may order the 17offending party to show cause before the Board of 18Commissioners of the sanitary district why the violation 19discharge should not be discontinued. A notice shall be served 20directing the offending party to show cause before the Board 21of Commissioners why an order should not be entered directing 22the discontinuance of the violation discharge. The notice 23shall specify the time and place where a hearing will be held 24and shall be served on the offending party by U.S. first-class 25mail, U.S. certified mail, personally, or by email as provided 26in subsection (m), at least 10 days before the hearing; and in   SB3704- 4 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1the case of a unit of local government or a corporation the 2service shall be upon an officer or agent thereof. The notice 3shall be accompanied by a show cause complaint. After 4reviewing the evidence, the Board of Commissioners may issue 5an order to the party responsible for the violation discharge, 6directing that within a specified period of time the violation 7discharge be discontinued. The Board of Commissioners may also 8order the party responsible for the violation discharge to pay 9a civil penalty in an amount specified by the Board of 10Commissioners that is not less than $1,500 $1,000 nor more 11than $5,000 $2,000 per day for each day of discharge of 12effluent in violation of this Act as provided in subsection 13(d). For the purposes of this subsection, each day that 14sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes are discharged into 15the sewerage system in violation of an ordinance, permit, 16rules, or regulations of the sanitary district, as documented 17in any notice of noncompliance or cease and desist order or 18multiple orders forming the basis of the show cause complaint, 19constitutes a separate violation. If the notice of 20noncompliance or cease and desist order indicates multiple 21exceedances in a single day of the pollutant limits set forth 22in such ordinance, permit, rules, or regulations, the number 23of violations in that day shall be the number of pollutant 24exceedances in that day. Each regulatory multiple day average 25that exceeds acceptable limits also constitutes a separate 26violation. The Board of Commissioners may also order the party   SB3704- 5 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1responsible for the violation to pay court reporter costs and 2hearing officer fees in a total amount not exceeding $3,000. 3Additional violations occurring after the last cited violation 4alleged in the show cause complaint may be included in a 5separate show cause proceeding or consolidated in the current 6show cause proceeding at the sanitary district's sole 7discretion. 8    (d) The Board of Commissioners shall establish procedures 9for assessing civil penalties and issuing orders under 10subsection (c) as follows:11        (1) In making its orders and determinations, the Board 12    of Commissioners shall take into consideration all the 13    facts and circumstances bearing on the activities involved 14    and the assessment of civil penalties as shown by the 15    record produced at the hearing.16        (2) The Board of Commissioners shall establish a panel 17    of independent hearing officers to conduct all hearings on 18    the assessment of civil penalties and issuance of orders 19    under subsection (c). The hearing officers shall be 20    attorneys licensed to practice law in this State.21        (3) The Board of Commissioners shall promulgate 22    procedural rules governing the proceedings, the assessment 23    of civil penalties, and the issuance of orders.24        (4) All hearings shall be on the record, and testimony 25    taken must be under oath and recorded stenographically. 26    Transcripts so recorded must be made available to any   SB3704- 6 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1    member of the public or any party to the hearing upon 2    payment of the usual charges for transcripts. At the 3    hearing, the hearing officer may issue, in the name of the 4    Board of Commissioners, notices of hearing requesting the 5    attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production 6    of evidence relevant to any matter involved in the hearing 7    and may examine witnesses.8        (5) The hearing officer shall conduct a full and 9    impartial hearing on the record, with an opportunity for 10    the presentation of evidence and cross-examination of the 11    witnesses. The hearing officer shall issue findings of 12    fact, conclusions of law, a recommended civil penalty, and 13    an order based solely on the record. The hearing officer 14    may also recommend, as part of the order, that the 15    discharge of industrial waste be discontinued within a 16    specified time.17        (6) The findings of fact, conclusions of law, 18    recommended civil penalty, and order shall be transmitted 19    to the Board of Commissioners along with a complete record 20    of the hearing.21        (7) The Board of Commissioners shall either approve or 22    disapprove the findings of fact, conclusions of law, 23    recommended civil penalty, and order. If the findings of 24    fact, conclusions of law, recommended civil penalty, or 25    order are rejected, the Board of Commissioners shall 26    remand the matter to the hearing officer for further   SB3704- 7 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1    proceedings. If the order is accepted by the Board of 2    Commissioners, it shall constitute the final order of the 3    Board of Commissioners.4        (8) (Blank).5        (9) The civil penalty specified by the Board of 6    Commissioners shall be paid within 35 days after the party 7    on whom it is imposed receives a written copy of the order 8    of the Board of Commissioners, unless the person or 9    persons to whom the order is issued seeks judicial review.10        (10) If the respondent seeks judicial review of the 11    order assessing civil penalties, the respondent shall, 12    within 35 days after the date of the final order, pay the 13    amount of the civil penalties into an escrow account 14    maintained by the district for that purpose or file a bond 15    guaranteeing payment of the civil penalties if the civil 16    penalties are upheld on review.17        (11) Civil penalties not paid by the times specified 18    above shall be delinquent and subject to a lien recorded 19    against the property of the person ordered to pay the 20    penalty. The foregoing provisions for asserting liens 21    against real estate by the sanitary district shall be in 22    addition to and not in derogation of any other remedy or 23    right of recovery, in law or equity, that the sanitary 24    district may have with respect to the collection or 25    recovery of penalties and charges imposed by the sanitary 26    district. Judgment in a civil action brought by the   SB3704- 8 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1    sanitary district to recover or collect the charges shall 2    not operate as a release and waiver of the lien upon the 3    real estate for the amount of the judgment. Only 4    satisfaction of the judgment or the filing of a release or 5    satisfaction of lien shall release the lien.6    (e) The executive director may order a person to cease the 7discharge of industrial waste upon a finding by the executive 8director that the final order of the Board of Commissioners 9entered after a hearing to show cause has been violated. The 10order shall be served on the offending party by U.S. 11first-class mail, U.S. certified mail, personally, or by email 12as provided in subsection (m). The order of the executive 13director shall also schedule an expedited hearing before a 14hearing officer designated by the Board of Commissioners for 15the purpose of determining whether the company has violated 16the final order of the Board of Commissioners. The Board of 17Commissioners shall adopt rules of procedure governing 18expedited hearings. In no event shall the hearing be conducted 19less than 7 days after service of the executive director's 20order on the offending party.21    At the conclusion of the expedited hearing, the hearing 22officer shall prepare a report with his or her findings and 23recommendations and transmit it to the Board of Commissioners. 24If the Board of Commissioners, after reviewing the findings 25and recommendations, and the record produced at the hearings, 26determines that the person has violated the Board of   SB3704- 9 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1Commissioner's final order, the Board of Commissioners may 2authorize the plugging of the sewer. The executive director 3shall give not less than 10 days written notice of the Board of 4Commissioner's order to the owner, officer, registered agent, 5or individual designated by permit, as well as the owner of 6record of the real estate and other parties known to be 7affected, that the sewer will be plugged.8    The foregoing provision for plugging a sewer shall be in 9addition to and not in derogation of any other remedy, in law 10or in equity, that the district may have to prevent violation 11of its ordinances and orders of its Board of Commissioners.12    (f) A violation of the final order of the Board of 13Commissioners shall be considered a nuisance. If any person 14discharges sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes into any 15waters contrary to the final order of the Board of 16Commissioners, the sanitary district acting through the 17executive director has the power to commence an action or 18proceeding in the circuit court in and for the county in which 19the sanitary district is located for the purpose of having the 20discharge stopped either by mandamus or injunction, or to 21remedy the violation in any manner provided for in this 22Section.23    The court shall specify a time, not exceeding 20 days 24after the service of the copy of the complaint, in which the 25party complained of must plead to the complaint, and in the 26meantime, the party may be restrained. In case of default or   SB3704- 10 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1after pleading, the court shall immediately inquire into the 2facts and circumstances of the case and enter an appropriate 3judgment in respect to the matters complained of. Appeals may 4be taken as in other civil cases.5    (g) The sanitary district, acting through the executive 6director, has the power to commence an action or proceeding 7for mandamus or injunction in the circuit court ordering a 8person to cease its discharge, when, in the opinion of the 9executive director, the person's discharge presents an 10imminent danger to the public health, welfare, or safety, 11presents or may present an endangerment to the environment, or 12threatens to interfere with the operation of the sewerage 13system or a water reclamation plant under the jurisdiction of 14the sanitary district. The initiation of a show cause hearing 15is not a prerequisite to the commencement by the sanitary 16district of an action or proceeding for mandamus or injunction 17in the circuit court. The court shall specify a time, not 18exceeding 20 days after the service of a copy of the petition, 19in which the party complained of must answer the petition, and 20in the meantime, the party may be restrained. In case of 21default in answer or after answer, the court shall immediately 22inquire into the facts and circumstances of the case and enter 23an appropriate judgment order in respect to the matters 24complained of. An appeal may be taken from the final judgment 25in the same manner and with the same effect as appeals are 26taken from judgment of the circuit court in other actions for   SB3704- 11 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1mandamus or injunction. 2    (h) Whenever the sanitary district commences an action 3under subsection (f) of this Section, the court shall assess a 4civil penalty of not less than $1,500 $1,000 nor more than 5$25,000 $10,000 for each day the person violates a Board 6order. Whenever the sanitary district commences an action 7under subsection (g) of this Section, the court shall assess a 8civil penalty of not less than $1,500 $1,000 nor more than 9$25,000 per violation $10,000 for each day the person violates 10the ordinance. Each day's continuance of the violation is a 11separate offense. For purposes of subsection (f), each day 12that sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes are discharged 13into the sewerage system in violation of a Board order 14constitutes a separate violation. For multiple exceedances in 15a single day of the pollutant limits set forth in the sanitary 16district's ordinance, permit, rules, or regulations, the 17number of violations in that day shall be the number of 18pollutant exceedances in that day. Each regulatory multiple 19day average that exceeds acceptable limits shall also 20constitute a separate violation. For purposes of subsection 21(g), in addition to the civil penalties available under 22subsection (c) of this Section, each day that the person's 23discharge presents an imminent danger to the public health, 24welfare, or safety, presents an endangerment to the 25environment, or threatens to interfere with the operation of 26the sewerage system or a water reclamation plant under the   SB3704- 12 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1jurisdiction of the sanitary district, constitutes a separate 2violation subject to the civil penalties available under this 3subsection. 4        The penalties provided in this Section plus interest 5at the rate set forth in the Interest Act on unpaid penalties, 6costs, and fees, imposed by the Board of Commissioners under 7subsection (d), the reasonable costs to the sanitary district 8of removal or other remedial action caused by discharges in 9violation of this Act, reasonable attorney's fees, court 10costs, and other expenses of litigation together with costs 11for inspection, sampling, analysis, and administration related 12to the enforcement action against the offending party are 13recoverable by the sanitary district in a civil action.14    (i) The Board of Commissioners may establish fees for late 15filing of reports with the sanitary district required by an 16ordinance governing discharges. The sanitary district shall 17provide a written notice of the fee assessment, by U.S. 18first-class mail, U.S. certified mail, personally, or by email 19as provided in subsection (m), that states the person has 30 20days after being served with the notice to request a 21conference with the executive director's designee to discuss 22or dispute the appropriateness of the assessed fee. Unless a 23person objects to paying the fee for filing a report late by 24timely requesting in writing a conference with a designee of 25the executive director, that person waives his or her right to 26a conference and the sanitary district may impose a lien   SB3704- 13 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1recorded against the property of the person for the amount of 2the unpaid fee.3    If a person requests a conference and the matter is not 4resolved at the conference, the person subject to the fee may 5request an administrative hearing before an impartial hearing 6officer appointed under subsection (d) to determine the 7person's liability for and the amount of the fee.8    If the hearing officer finds that the late filing fees are 9owed to the sanitary district, the sanitary district shall 10notify the responsible person or persons of the hearing 11officer's decision. If payment is not made within 30 days 12after the notice, the sanitary district may impose a lien on 13the property of the person or persons.14    Any liens filed under this subsection shall apply only to 15the property to which the late filing fees are related. A claim 16for lien shall be filed in the office of the recorder of the 17county in which the property is located. The filing of a claim 18for lien by the district does not prevent the sanitary 19district from pursuing other means for collecting late filing 20fees. If a claim for lien is filed, the sanitary district shall 21notify the person whose property is subject to the lien, and 22the person may challenge the lien by filing an action in the 23circuit court. The action shall be filed within 90 days after 24the person receives the notice of the filing of the claim for 25lien. The court shall hear evidence concerning the underlying 26reasons for the lien only if an administrative hearing has not   SB3704- 14 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1been held under this subsection.2    (j) If the provisions of any paragraph of this Section are 3declared unconstitutional or invalid by the final decision of 4any court of competent jurisdiction, the provisions of the 5remaining paragraphs continue in effect.6    (k) Nothing in this Section eliminates any of the powers 7now granted to municipalities having a population of 500,000 8or more as to design, preparation of plans, and construction, 9maintenance, and operation of sewers and sewerage systems, or 10for the control and elimination or prevention of the pollution 11of their waters or waterways, in the Illinois Municipal Code 12or any other Act of the State of Illinois.13    (l) The provisions of the Administrative Review Law and 14all amendments and rules adopted pursuant to that Law apply to 15and govern all proceedings for the judicial review of final 16administrative decisions of the Board of Commissioners in the 17enforcement of any ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted 18under this Act.19    (m) Solely in relation to the discharge of sewage, 20industrial wastes, or other wastes subject to one of the 21sanitary district's ordinances, the sanitary district may 22implement an electronic reporting system that will allow 23notices, orders, and other documents to be sent directly by 24email to persons or entities registered with the sanitary 25district, and, in the discretion of the sanitary district, to 26allow those persons or entities registered with the sanitary   SB3704- 15 -LRB104 20622 RTM 34118 b1district to view, modify, or submit documents using the 2electronic reporting system. Wherever this Section provides 3for service of documents by the sanitary district by U.S. 4first-class mail, U.S. certified mail, or personal service, 5the sanitary district may serve by email the documents upon 6the registered persons or entities in lieu of service by U.S. 7first-class mail, U.S. certified mail, or personal service. 8Enrollment in the electronic reporting system in this 9subsection is voluntary and limited to nonresidential 10facilities or uses. Service by email under this Section is 11only permitted on those persons or entities that voluntarily 12enroll in the system. The sanitary district shall adopt rules, 13as approved by ordinance, to ensure service of process by 14email is properly effectuated upon the registered persons and 15entities. 16(Source: P.A. 103-334, eff. 7-28-23.)